Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Hospital Districts

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d Hospitals and Asylums §§ 13 to 26; 71 Am. Jur. 2d State and Local Taxation §§ 296.

Property used by personnel as living quarters or for recreation purposes as within contemplation of tax exemptions extended to property of religious, educational, charitable, or hospital organizations, 15 ALR2d 1064, 55 ALR3d 356, 55 ALR3d 485.

Garage or parking lot as within tax exemption extended to property of educational, charitable or hospital organizations, 33 ALR3d 938.

Exemption of charitable or educational organization from sales or use tax, 53 ALR3d 748.

§ 35-2-401.
Establishment of hospital district.

through (c) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

A special hospital district may be established and subsequent elections held under the procedures for petitioning, hearing and election of special districts as set forth in the Special District Elections Act of 1994.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2017, Ch. 106, § 2.

As an alternative to the procedures specified in subsection (d) of this section, a special hospital district may be established and subsequent elections held through the following procedures:

The board of county commissioners may, by resolution, submit the question of establishing the special hospital district to the electors of the proposed district at the next general election or another date as provided by W.S.

22-2-104

. The board shall provide notice that it will consider the resolution at least thirty (30) days prior to the meeting at which the resolution will be considered. Notice of the election shall be given as required by W.S.

22-29-110

;

If a majority of the voters in the proposed district voting at the election specified in paragraph (i) of this subsection vote for the establishment of the district the board of county commissioners shall enter that fact upon its record and the district is established;

Any subsequent election for a special hospital district established under this subsection shall be held as set forth in the Special District Elections Act of 1994.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 244, § 1; 1957, ch. 54, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-114; Laws 1959, ch. 144, § 1; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2, 5; 2013 ch. 48, § 1, effective February 15, 2013; 2017 ch. 106, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 101, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “created and subsequent district elections held through the following procedure:” for “established and subsequent elections held under the procedures for petitioning, hearing and election of special districts as set forth in the Special District Elections Act of 1994.” in (d); and added (d)(i) through (d)(iii).

Laws 2013, ch. 48, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 15, 2013.

The 2018 amendment,

added (e).

Laws 2018, ch. 101, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

Cited

in

Reynolds v. West Park Hosp. Dist. (In re West Park Hosp. Dist.), 2010 WY 69, 231 P.3d 1275,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(May 27, 2010); Guier v. Teton County Hosp. Dist., 2011 WY 31, — P.3d —,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Feb. 24, 2011).

§ 35-2-402.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 144, § 2, related to establishment of a hospital district upon majority vote.

§ 35-2-403.
Body corporate; name and style; powers generally; rules and regulations of trustees; definitions of certain terms.

Each district is a body corporate, the name of which shall be selected by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the greater area of land within the district is located and which shall be entered upon the commissioner’s records. In the name selected, the district may hold property and be a party to contracts, shall have power to sue and be sued, shall be empowered through its governing board to acquire real and personal property and equipment for hospital purposes by gift, devise, bequest or purchase, and enter into contracts for the acquisition by purchase or lease of real and personal property and equipment and convey, lease and otherwise dispose of its property for the hospital. The trustees may make rules and regulations necessary for the purposes of the hospital district and shall file them with the county clerk for each county in which the district is located, and establish sinking funds for hospital purposes as well as issue bonds for the purchase of real property and improvements and equipment for hospital purposes in the manner hereinafter provided.

As used in this act:

“Hospital” and “hospital purposes” means any institution, place, building or agency in which any accommodation is maintained, furnished or offered for the hospitalization of the sick or injured or care of any person requiring or receiving chronic or convalescent care or emergency medical services, and includes public health centers, community mental health centers and other types of hospitals and centers, including but not limited to general, tuberculosis, mental and chronic disease hospitals, and also medical facilities, and related facilities;

“Medical facilities” includes but is not limited to diagnostic or treatment centers, rehabilitation facilities and nursing homes, as those terms are defined in the Federal Act Public Law 482, 83 congress, July 12, 1954 (C. 471, Sec. 4 (c)-(f), 68 Stat. 465-466), as amended;

“Related facilities” means but is not limited to laboratories, outpatient departments, nurses’ homes and nurses’ training facilities and central service facilities operated in connection with hospitals.

In addition to subsection (a) of this section, each district may engage in activities authorized under:

W.S.

18-8-301

subject to requirements and conditions specified therein;

W.S. 35-2-1202(a) for the purpose of providing senior health care as defined in W.S. 35-2-1201(b). This paragraph shall not be construed to authorize an increase to the district mill level beyond the limits established in W.S.

35-2-414

.

Subject to constitutional limitations, in addition to any other securities the legislature authorizes or has authorized by law for investment, any funds of the district may be invested by the board in any security which has been recommended by an investment advisor registered under the Uniform Investment Advisor’s Act of 1940 as amended, or any bank exercising its trust powers, and approved by the district board. In approving securities for the investment under this subsection, the board shall be subject to and act in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Uniform Prudent Investor Act. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to authorize the use of any revenues generated from taxes to engage in any activity authorized under W.S. 18-8-301(a).

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 244, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-116; Laws 1959, ch. 142, § 1; 1965, ch. 99, § 1; 1975, ch. 39, § 1; 1989, ch. 136, § 2; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 2005, ch. 172, § 1; 2016 ch. 64, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2020 ch. 17, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment

added (d).

Laws 2005, ch. 172, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, inserted “or emergency medical services” near the middle of (b)(i).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (c) added designation (i) and added (c)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

The federal act cited in subsection (b)(ii) appeared as 42 U.S.C. § 291i before being omitted when title 42 was revised in 1964.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

§ 35-2-404.
Procedure for initial election of trustees; number, term of trustees; qualifications; disposition of ballots and affidavits.

An election of trustees shall be held in accordance with the Special District Elections Act of 1994 at the same time as the election for the formation of the district. At the election a board of five (5) trustees shall be elected who shall serve without compensation to govern the affairs of the district. There shall be elected three (3) members to serve until the next succeeding district election and two (2) members to serve until the second succeeding district election and until their successors are elected and qualified. Thereafter, members shall be elected for terms of four (4) years. The board of trustees shall, prior to the publication of notice required under W.S. 22-29-112(c), determine whether the board of trustees should be established at five (5) members or seven (7) members. If the board determines that the number of trustees should be expanded it may appoint the additional members in accordance with W.S.

22-29-202

until the next subsequent trustee election. The next subsequent trustee election shall reflect any modification made. If a board of trustees fails to establish the number of trustees to be elected, the board shall be established at five (5) members. No current term of any trustee shall be affected by any modification made under this subsection. Subsequent elections shall be held in accordance with the Special District Elections Act of 1994.

Excluding employees of the district, any qualified elector resident in a hospital district is eligible to hold the office of hospital district trustee in the hospital district.

After the official certificate of election has been prepared, ballots and affidavits shall be sealed in envelopes and retained by the appropriate board for six (6) months or until termination of any election contest affected by the ballots or affidavits and shall then be destroyed. Prior to destruction, the envelope shall be opened only on court order.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 244, § 4, W.S. 1957, § 35-117; Laws 1980, ch. 19, § 2; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2; 2005, ch. 240, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a).

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 240, § 2, directs that any additional hospital district trustee authorized pursuant to the act is to be appointed in accordance with W.S.

22-29-202

and is to serve until the next subsequent trustee election for trustees of the hospital district, at which time a trustee will be elected for a four-year term. Special hospital district boards of trustees consisting of six members as of the effective date of the act will be modified to consist of either five or seven members as provided in amended subsection (a). No current term of any special hospital district trustee is to be affected by this act.

Cited

in

Reynolds v. West Park Hosp. Dist. (In re West Park Hosp. Dist.), 2010 WY 69, 231 P.3d 1275,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(May 27, 2010); Guier v. Teton County Hosp. Dist., 2011 WY 31, — P.3d —,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Feb. 24, 2011).

§§ 35-2-405 through 35-2-411.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1980, ch. 19, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 244, §§ 5 to 11, related to hospital district elections.

§§ 35-2-412 and 35-2-413.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 244, § 12 and 13, related to the trustees' oath of office and the election of trustee officers.

Cross references. —

For constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20, 21, Wyo. Const.

§ 35-2-414.
Administration of finances; assessment and levy of tax.

The board of trustees of special hospital districts shall administer the finances of such districts according to the provisions of the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act. The assessor shall at the time of making the annual assessment of his district also assess the property of each special hospital district in his county and return to the county assessor at the time of returning the assessment schedules, separate schedules listing the property of each such district assessed by him. Said separate schedules shall be compiled by the county assessor, footed and returned to the board of county commissioners as provided for other assessment schedules.

The board of county commissioners, at the time of making the levy for county purposes shall levy a tax for that year upon the taxable property in such district in its county for its proportionate share based on assessed valuation of the estimated amount of funds needed by each such district, but in no case shall the tax for such district exceed in any one (1) year the amount of three (3) mills for operation on each dollar of assessed valuation of such property except as provided by subsection (c) of this section. There shall be no limit on the assessment for the payment of principal and interest on bonds approved by the board of county commissioners and approved by the electors of the district as provided in W.S.

35-2-415

. The taxes and assessments of all special hospital districts shall be collected by the county collector at the same time and in the same manner as state and county taxes are collected, provided, however, said assessment and tax levied under the provisions of this act [§§

35-2-401

through

35-2-421

] shall not be construed as being a part of the general county mill levy.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, if the board of trustees votes to increase the mill levy beyond three (3) mills as authorized by subsection (b) of this section, the board of county commissioners shall call an election within the district upon the question of whether the mill levy should be increased beyond three (3) mills. The election shall be called, conducted and canvassed as provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

, on the first date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

which is not less than sixty (60) days after the trustees vote to increase the mill levy beyond three (3) mills. In no event shall the tax in a district exceed in any one (1) year the amount of six (6) mills for operation and maintenance on each dollar of assessed valuation of property. The increase in mill levy is effective only if the question is approved by a majority of those voting thereon within the hospital district. The cost of any special election under this subsection shall be borne by the board of trustees.

If the proposition to authorize a mill levy is approved, the same proposition or a proposition to impose a mill levy in a different amount, not to exceed three (3) mills, shall be submitted to the voters, until defeated, at the second general election following the election at which the proposition was initially approved and at the general election held every four (4) years thereafter. If the proposition to impose or continue the tax is defeated, the proposition shall not again be submitted to the electors for at least twenty-three (23) months.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 244, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 35-127; Laws 1959, ch. 144, § 3; 1971, ch. 153, § 1; 1991, ch. 236, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 2010, ch. 3, § 2; 2012, ch. 98, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “at the second general election following the election at which the proposition was initially approved and” in (d).

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act” for “Wyoming Municipal Budget Act” in (a).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

Wyoming Municipal Budget Act. —

The Wyoming Municipal Budget Act, referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a), appeared as §§ 9-7-301 through 9-7-316 before being repealed in 1980, prior to the 1982 revision of title 9.

Hospital district tax levy authorized though town's general levy exceeded limit when both combined. —

The county commissioners could levy a tax of not exceeding three mills for the operation and maintenance of a hospital district though tax when combined with town's general levy exceeded eight mills, since operation and maintenance of a hospital district is not an essential function of a town or city. War Memorial Hosp. of Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 371, 279 P.2d 472,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1955).

§ 35-2-415.
General obligation coupon bonds; requirements as to issuance generally; submission of question to electors.

The board of trustees of a hospital district may upon approval of the board of county commissioners submit to the electors of the district the question whether the board shall be authorized to issue the general obligation coupon bonds of the district in a certain amount, not to exceed five percent (5%) of the assessed value of the taxable property in the district, and bearing a certain rate of interest, payable and redeemable at a certain time, not exceeding twenty-five (25) years for the purchase of real property, for the construction or purchase of improvements and for equipment for hospital purposes.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 244, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 35-129; Laws 1969, ch. 20, § 1; 1971, ch. 254, § 27; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to payment of interest and principal, see §

35-2-420

.

Issuance by trustees requires electorate approval. —

When general obligation bonds are to be issued by trustees of hospital district, there must be election by submitting the question to the electors for prior approval. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 35-2-416.
General obligation coupon bonds; conduct and results of election.

The election authorized under W.S.

35-2-415

shall be called, conducted and the results thereof canvassed and certified in all respects as near as practicable in the same manner as is provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 244, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 35-130; Laws 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

§ 35-2-417.
General obligation coupon bonds; issuance, form, notice, value, rejection of bids, and private sale.

If the proposal to issue said bonds shall be approved, the board of trustees may issue such bonds in such form as the board may direct and shall give notice by publication in some newspaper published in the counties in which said district is located and in some newspaper of general circulation in the capital of this state of its intention to issue and negotiate such bonds, and to invite bidders therefor; provided that in no case shall such bonds be sold for less than their full or par value and the accrued interest thereon at the time of their delivery. And the said trustees are authorized to reject any bids, and to sell said bonds at private sale, if they deem it for the best interests of the district.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 244, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 35-131.

§ 35-2-418.
General obligation coupon bonds; preparation and execution; register to be kept.

After ascertaining the best terms upon and the lowest interest at which said bonds can be negotiated, the board shall secure the proper engraving and printing and consecutive numbering thereof, and said bonds shall thereupon be otherwise properly prepared and executed. They must bear the signature of the president of the board of trustees and be countersigned by the secretary of the board and bear the district seal and be countersigned by the county treasurer of the county in which said district’s funds are kept, and the coupons attached to the bonds must be signed by the said president, secretary and county treasurer; and the secretary of the board shall endorse a certificate upon every such bond, that the same is within the lawful debt limit of such district and is issued according to law and he shall sign such certificate in his official character. When so executed, they shall be registered by the county treasurer where said district’s funds are kept in a book provided for that purpose, which must show the number and amount of each bond and the person to whom the same is issued.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 244, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 35-132.

§ 35-2-419.
General obligation coupon bonds; payment guaranteed.

The full faith and credit of each hospital district is solemnly pledged for the payment of the interest and the redemption of the principal of all bonds which are issued by such district.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 244, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 35-133.

§ 35-2-420.
General obligation coupon bonds; payment of interest and principal.

The county treasurer where said district’s funds are kept may pay out of any moneys belonging to said district tax fund, the interest and the principal upon any bonds issued by such district, when the same becomes due, upon the presentation at his office of the proper coupon or bond, which must show the amount due, and each coupon must also show the number of the bond to which it belonged, and all bonds and coupons so paid, must be reported to the district trustees at their first regular meeting thereafter.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 244, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 35-134.

Cross references. —

As to rate of interest, see §

35-2-415

.

§ 35-2-421.
General obligation coupon bonds; validity.

All hospital districts heretofore formed and organized under the provisions of chapter 58 of the Session Laws of Wyoming, 1949, or under the provisions of chapter 141, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1951, are hereby declared to be duly organized and existing hospital districts; and all bonds heretofore issued and sold for the purpose of providing for the purchase of real property and improvements and equipment for hospital purposes, by any hospital district established under the provisions of chapter 58, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1949, or under the provisions of chapter 141, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1951, where the purchase money for such bonds has been actually received and retained for the purpose for which such bonds were sold, are hereby declared to be the valid and legally binding obligations of such district and all proceedings under which such bonds were issued are approved, ratified and declared valid.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 244, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 35-135.

Editor's notes. —

Chapter 58, Laws 1949, and ch. 141, Laws 1951, referred to in this section, were repealed by § 25, ch. 243, Laws 1955, and by § 24, ch. 244, Laws 1955.

Severability. —

Section 23, ch. 244, Laws 1955, reads: “It is hereby declared to be the legislative intention that if any portion or part of this act shall be judicially determined to be unconstitutional, the remainder of the act shall continue in full force and effect.”

§ 35-2-422.
Additional area within district; annexation; method.

Whenever a hospital district has been established as provided by law, it may be enlarged by annexation of additional, contiguous territory within the county.

Whenever a petition, signed by twenty-five percent (25%) of the registered electors residing within the area to be annexed in the county which is not part of an established hospital district in the county, is presented to the board of county commissioners of the county, the county commissioners shall within five (5) days request the board of trustees of the established hospital district either to approve or reject the petition.

The board of trustees of the hospital district shall act upon the request within thirty (30) days. If no action is taken within that time, the petition is deemed rejected by the trustees. If the petition is accepted by the trustees, the board of county commissioners shall call an election within the county upon the question of whether the area described by the petition shall be annexed to the existing hospital district. The election shall be called for the next election date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

which is not less than sixty (60) days after the petition is accepted and be conducted in accordance with the procedure for bond elections as provided by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

. The annexation is effective only if the question is approved by a majority of those voting thereon both within the existing hospital district and within the area described by the petition. The board of county commissioners shall by resolution declare the district expanded by the additional area and shall designate a name for the expanded hospital district.

After the resolution declaring the existence of the expanded hospital district, the board of county commissioners shall call an election for the purpose of election of trustees of the hospital district as expanded. The board of trustees of the hospital district shall be qualified electors of the entire district so expanded. The election shall be called for a date determined by the board of county commissioners and shall be held in the manner provided by law for the first election of trustees of the original district. Trustees of the original district shall remain in office until the trustees of the expanded district are elected and qualified.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 167, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-135.1; Laws 1978, ch. 16, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 35-2-423.
Restriction on maintenance of hospitals in cities and towns.

No city or town which is within the boundaries of a special hospital district organized under W.S.

35-2-401

through

35-2-436

[35-2-401 through

35-2-438

] shall construct or operate a hospital more than one (1) year after the formation of the hospital district. Nothing in this section prohibits a city or town from contributing to the support of a hospital district.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 153, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-136; Laws 1979, ch. 85, § 1.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 153, Laws 1953, repealed all acts or parts of acts inconsistent with that act.

§ 35-2-424.
Securities for acquiring and improving hospitals and related facilities; issuance authorized; lines of credit and tax and revenue anticipation notes.

The trustees of a hospital district established pursuant to W.S.

35-2-401

, are hereby authorized to issue revenue bonds, notes and warrants or other revenue securities, hereinafter referred to as securities, for the purpose of acquiring, erecting, constructing, reconstructing, improving, remodeling, furnishing and equipping hospitals and related facilities including any facilities for senior health care as defined under W.S. 35-2-1201(b), and acquiring a site or sites therefor, from time to time hereafter as the trustees may determine.

If there are no monies available to the trustees of a hospital district before receipt of property taxes the trustees may issue warrants in anticipation of the receipt of property taxes for payment of operational expenses. The aggregate amount of the warrants shall not exceed the total amount of taxes levied. The warrants shall be payable solely from the collected taxes.

The trustees of a hospital district may obtain financing for its operations by entering into agreements for lines of credit with any financial institution as defined in W.S. 13-1-101(a)(ix). The line of credit may either be unsecured, or secured by a pledge of revenues anticipated to be received during the current fiscal year.

In addition to its authority to issue warrants under this section, the trustees of a hospital district may issue tax and revenue anticipation notes in amounts not to exceed eighty percent (80%) of the total amount of taxes levied for operation of the district for the fiscal year during which the notes are issued when the board determines that insufficient funds are available to meet the obligations of the hospital during any fiscal year. A hospital district shall not enter into agreements or issue instruments of the type allowed by this section for any fiscal year until all debts financed by such agreements or instruments for any prior fiscal year have been paid in full. Tax and revenue anticipation notes issued under this subsection are subject to the procedural requirements of W.S.

9-4-1103

through

9-4-1105

for state tax and revenue anticipation notes, except:

The authority of the state treasurer referenced in W.S.

9-4-1103

through

9-4-1105

shall be exercised by the board issuing the notes; and

Notwithstanding W.S. 9-4-1105(a), investments of the proceeds of the notes by the board are limited to those investments authorized under W.S.

9-4-831

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 25, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-136.1; Laws 1989, ch. 93, § 1; 2000, ch. 46, § 1; 2020 ch. 17, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

For General Obligation Public Securities Refunding Law, see §§

16-5-101

to

16-5-119

.

For 1965 Public Securities Validation Act, see §§

16-5-201

to

16-5-204

.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a), added “including any facilities for senior health care as defined under W.S. 35-2-1201(b)” following “related facilities.”

Cited

in

Frank v. City of Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 35-2-425.
Securities for acquiring hospitals and related facilities; requirements generally.

Except as otherwise provided, securities issued hereunder shall be authorized by resolution adopted by the trustees, shall bear date or dates, shall be in a denomination or denominations, shall mature at a time or times but in no event exceeding fifty (50) years from their date, shall be sold at public or private sale, and the securities and coupons shall be payable in a medium of payment at a banking institution or other place or places within or without the state, as determined by the trustees, may be made subject to prior redemption in advance of maturity in order or by lot or otherwise at a time or times without or with the payment of a premium or premiums not exceeding ten percent (10%) of the principal amount of the security so redeemed, as determined by the trustees. The resolution may provide for the accumulation of net revenue for a reserve fund and shall contain other or further covenants and agreements as may be determined by the governing board for the protection of bondholders.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of securities or other instruments appertaining thereto may provide for the capitalizing of interest on any securities during any period of construction estimated by the trustees and one (1) year thereafter and any other cost of any project herein authorized, by providing for the payment of the amount capitalized from the proceeds of the securities.

Securities may be issued with privileges for conversion or registration, or both, for payment as to principal or interest, or both.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of securities, or any other instrument appertaining thereto may provide for their reissuance in other denominations in negotiable or nonnegotiable form and otherwise in such manner and form as the trustees may determine.

Any resolution authorizing, or other instrument appertaining to, any securities hereunder may provide that each security therein authorized shall recite that it is issued under authority hereof. Such recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all of the provisions hereof, and all securities issued containing such recital shall be incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

Subject to the payment provisions herein specifically provided, any securities, any interest coupons thereto attached, shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all the purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code [§§ 34.1-1-101 through 34.1-10-104], except as the trustees may otherwise provide, and each holder of such security, or of any coupons appertaining thereto, by accepting such security or coupon shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed that such security or coupon (except as otherwise provided) is and shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all purposes of said Uniform Commercial Code.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the trustees in any proceedings authorizing securities hereunder:

May provide for the initial issuance of one (1) or more securities aggregating the amount of the entire issue or any part thereof;

May make such provisions for installment payments of the principal amount of any such security as it may consider desirable;

May provide for the making of any such security payable to bearer or otherwise, registrable as to principal or as to both principal and interest, and where interest accruing thereon is not represented by interest coupons, for the endorsing of payment of interest on such securities.

Except for any securities which are registrable for payment of interest, interest coupons payable to bearer and appertaining to the securities shall be issued and shall bear the original or facsimile signature of the president of the trustees.

Any securities herein authorized may be executed as provided by W.S.

16-2-101

through

16-2-103

.

The securities and any coupons bearing the signature of the officers in office at the time of the signing thereof, shall be valid and binding obligations of the trustees, notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor, any or all of the persons whose signatures appear thereon shall have ceased to fill their respective offices.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 25, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-136.2; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 42; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Election not required. —

This section and §§

35-2-426

through

35-2-428

do not require election prior to issuance of revenue bonds, payable solely from special fund revenues derived from and realized after payment of costs of operation and maintenance of facilities. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 35-2-426.
Securities for acquiring hospitals and related facilities; not a general obligation of hospital district or trustees; payable from special fund.

The securities to be issued hereunder shall not constitute a general obligation of the hospital district, nor of the trustees, but shall be payable solely from a special fund to contain the net revenue to be derived from the operation of the hospitals and related facilities including any facilities for senior health care as defined under W.S. 35-2-1201(b), such revenues being defined as those remaining after paying the costs of operating and maintaining said facilities.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 25, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-136.3; Laws 2020, ch. 17, § 2.

Election not required. —

This section and §§

35-2-425

,

35-2-427

and

35-2-428

do not require election prior to issuance of revenue bonds, payable solely from special fund revenues derived from and realized after payment of costs of operation and maintenance of facilities. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added “including any facilities for senior health care as defined under W.S. 35-2-1201(b)” following “related facilities.”

§ 35-2-427.
Securities for acquiring hospitals and related facilities; issuance from time to time in one or more series.

The securities authorized hereby may be issued from time to time and in one (1) or more series as the trustees may determine.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 25, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 35-136.4.

Election not required. —

This section and §§

35-2-425

,

35-2-426

and

35-2-428

do not require an election prior to issuance of revenue bonds, payable solely from special fund revenues derived from and realized after payment of costs of operation and maintenance of facilities. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 35-2-428.
Securities for acquiring hospitals and related facilities; obligation of trustees to holders; suit for default, misuse of funds.

The obligation of the trustees to the holders of the securities shall be limited to applying the funds, as set forth above, to the payment of interest and principal on said securities, and the securities shall contain a provision to that effect. In the event of default in the payment of said securities or the interest thereon, and in the event that the trustees are misusing such funds or not using them as provided by this act and the resolution authorizing the securities, or in the event of any other breach of any protective covenant or other contractual limitation, then such holders, or any of them, may bring suit against the trustees in the district court of the county in which the hospital or any of its related facilities including any facilities for senior health care as defined under W.S. 35-2-1201(b), are located for the purpose of restraining the trustees from using such funds for any purpose other than the payment of the principal and interest on such securities in the manner provided, or for any other appropriate remedy.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 25, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 35-136.5; Laws 2020, ch. 17, § 2.

Election not required. —

This section and §§

35-2-425

through

35-2-427

do not require election prior to issuance of revenue bonds, payable solely from special fund revenues derived from and realized after payment of costs of operation and maintenance of facilities. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added “including any facilities for senior health care as defined under W.S. 35-2-1201(b)” following “related facilities.”

§ 35-2-429.
Construction to be done by contract based on competitive bidding; alternate delivery methods.

Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section and otherwise, the work of constructing the various buildings shall be done by contract based on competitive bidding. Notice of call for bids shall be for such period of time and in such manner as the trustees may determine, and the trustees shall have the power to reject any and all bids and readvertise for bids as they consider proper.

Any hospital district may contract for design and construction services through an alternate delivery method as defined in W.S.

16-6-701

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 25, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 35-136.6; Laws 2006, ch. 98, § 2.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (b), substituted “provided under subsection (b) of this section and otherwise” for “herein otherwise provided” in (a).

§ 35-2-430.
Board may insure facilities.

The board may insure said facilities against public liability, property damage or loss of revenues from any cause.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 25, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 35-136.7.

The purchase of liability insurance is a waiver of tort immunity,

at least up to the amount of the coverage. Collins v. Memorial Hosp., 521 P.2d 1339,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1974) (commented on in 10 Land & Water L. Rev. 283 (1975)).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” 7 Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

§ 35-2-431.
Investment in securities.

Securities issued pursuant to this act [§§

35-2-424

through

35-2-436

] shall be eligible for investment by banking institutions and for estate, trust, and fiduciary funds, and such securities and the interest thereon shall be exempt from taxation by this state and any subdivision thereof. The state treasurer of the state of Wyoming with the approval of the governor and the attorney general is hereby authorized to invest any permanent state funds available for investment in the securities to be issued hereunder.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 25, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 35-136.8.